Massachusetts, session 194th, S2059.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2008 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after paragraph (a) the following new paragraph:-
(b) A credit of $1,000 shall be allowed against the taxes due if the taxpayer has provided
more than one-half of the support for a relative diagnosed with aphasia, provided that the relative
resided with the taxpayer for more than 6 months of the taxable year. If the credit provided in
this section reduces the tax to zero, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a refund equal to the amount
by which the amount of the credit exceeded the amount of tax due.
of 1